Maryland, session 2026, HB0235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
6–305.
(a) (1) A small business, nonprofit organization, or microenterprise may apply
for financial assistance under the Business Development Program.
(2) The Department shall review each application.
(b) An applicant may qualify for financial assistance for a project in a priority
funding area or an eligible opportunity zone if the application demonstrates that:
(1) the financial assistance from the Fund is the minimum amount
necessary to make the project financially feasible;
(2) the project is ready to proceed when it receives financial assistance from
the Business Development Program; and
(3) any food desert project includes a plan to seek out sources of
Maryland–grown produce and Maryland produced foods.
(c) [(1)] The Department shall provide written notice to the political subdivision
in which the proposed project is located.
– 1 –

Ch. 597 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Department
may not approve an application unless the political subdivision in which the proposed
project is located approves the application by:
(i) resolution; or
(ii) letter, delivered to the Department by the political subdivision’s
authorized designee, expressing support of the plan or project.
(3) If the Department does not receive notice of approval or denial of an
application from the affected jurisdictions within 45 15 days after notice of the proposed
project is given in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Department may
approve the application.]
(d) Financial assistance under the Business Development Program may be
provided to a small business, nonprofit organization, or microenterprise as:
(1) a grant;
(2) a loan;
(3) a reduction in the principal obligation of or interest rate on a loan or
portion of a loan;
(4) a prepayment of interest on a subordinate or superior loan or portion of
a loan;
(5) an assurance;
(6) a guarantee;
(7) any other form of credit enhancement; or
(8) a promissory note that may be converted to an equity ownership
interest and liquidated at the earliest opportunity to realize the highest market value for
the Department.
(e) (1) The Department shall reserve at least the lesser of $5,000,000 or the
annual capital appropriation for the Fund to make financial assistance available to projects
located in sustainable communities.
(2) The Department may meet the funding obligations for sustainable
communities and food deserts by using any financial assistance available to the
Department that is authorized to be used for these projects.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 597
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –